Illinois, session 104th, SB3398.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Health Care Surrogate Act is amended by 5changing Sections 25 and 30 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 40/25)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 851-25)7    Sec. 25. Surrogate decision making. 8    (a) When a patient lacks decisional capacity, the health 9care provider must make a reasonable inquiry as to the 10availability and authority of a health care agent under the 11Powers of Attorney for Health Care Law. When no health care 12agent is authorized and available, the health care provider 13must make a reasonable inquiry as to the availability of 14possible surrogates listed in items (1) through (4) of this 15subsection. For purposes of this Section, a reasonable inquiry 16includes, but is not limited to, identifying a member of the 17patient's family or other health care agent by examining the 18patient's personal effects or medical records. If a family 19member or other health care agent is identified, an attempt to 20contact that person by telephone must be made within 24 hours 21after a determination by the provider that the patient lacks 22decisional capacity. No person shall be liable for civil 23damages or subject to professional discipline based on a claim   SB3398 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17550 JRC 30978 b1of violating a patient's right to confidentiality as a result 2of making a reasonable inquiry as to the availability of a 3patient's family member or health care agent, except for 4willful or wanton misconduct.5    The surrogate decision makers, as identified by the 6attending physician, are then authorized to make decisions as 7follows: (i) for patients who lack decisional capacity and do 8not have a qualifying condition, medical treatment decisions 9may be made in accordance with subsection (b-5) of Section 20; 10and (ii) for patients who lack decisional capacity and have a 11qualifying condition, medical treatment decisions including 12whether to forgo life-sustaining treatment on behalf of the 13patient may be made without court order or judicial 14involvement in the following order of priority:15        (1) the patient's guardian of the person;16        (2) the patient's spouse;17        (3) any adult son or daughter of the patient;18        (4) either parent of the patient;19        (5) any adult brother or sister of the patient;20        (6) any adult grandchild of the patient;21        (7) a close friend of the patient;22        (8) the patient's guardian of the estate;23        (9) the patient's temporary custodian appointed under 24    subsection (2) of Section 2-10 of the Juvenile Court Act 25    of 1987 if the court has entered an order granting such 26    authority pursuant to subsection (12) of Section 2-10 of   SB3398 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17550 JRC 30978 b1    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 2    The health care provider shall have the right to rely on 3any of the above surrogates if the provider believes after 4reasonable inquiry that neither a health care agent under the 5Powers of Attorney for Health Care Law nor a surrogate of 6higher priority is available.7    Where there are multiple surrogate decision makers at the 8same priority level in the hierarchy, it shall be the 9responsibility of those surrogates to make reasonable efforts 10to reach a consensus as to their decision on behalf of the 11patient regarding the forgoing of life-sustaining treatment. 12If 2 or more surrogates who are in the same category and have 13equal priority indicate to the attending physician that they 14disagree about the health care matter at issue, a majority of 15the available persons in that category (or the parent with 16custodial rights) shall control, unless the minority (or the 17parent without custodial rights) initiates guardianship 18proceedings in accordance with the Probate Act of 1975. No 19health care provider or other person is required to seek 20appointment of a guardian.21    (b) After a surrogate has been identified, the name, 22address, telephone number, and relationship of that person to 23the patient shall be recorded in the patient's medical record.24    (c) Any surrogate who becomes unavailable for any reason 25may be replaced by applying the provisions of Section 25 in the 26same manner as for the initial choice of surrogate.  SB3398 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17550 JRC 30978 b1    (d) In the event an individual of a higher priority to an 2identified surrogate becomes available and willing to be the 3surrogate, the individual with higher priority may be 4identified as the surrogate. In the event an individual in a 5higher, a lower, or the same priority level or a health care 6provider seeks to challenge the priority of or the 7life-sustaining treatment decision of the recognized surrogate 8decision maker, the challenging party may initiate 9guardianship proceedings in accordance with the Probate Act of 101975.11    (e) The surrogate decision maker shall have the same right 12as the patient to receive medical information and medical 13records and to consent to disclosure. Except as otherwise 14provided by law, a health care provider shall, in response to a 15written request from an individual who was named as a 16surrogate or any person, entity, or organization presenting a 17valid authorization for the release of records signed by the 18surrogate, release the medical records in accordance with 19Section 8-2001 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 20    (f) Any surrogate shall have the authority to make 21decisions for the patient until removed by the patient who no 22longer lacks decisional capacity, appointment of a guardian of 23the person, or the patient's death.24    (g) Upon a determination that a patient lacks decisional 25capacity and a health care surrogate is identified, a health 26care facility shall provide written information, which may be   SB3398 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17550 JRC 30978 b1provided electronically, to the surrogate that states:2        (1) that a named patient has been determined to lack 3    decisional capacity by the attending physician, the name 4    of the attending physician, and the date of such 5    determination;6        (2) that the surrogate was designated under this 7    Section and has the rights and responsibilities prescribed 8    by this Act, including the right to obtain the patient's 9    medical records;10        (3) the identification of the surrogate, including the 11    surrogate's name, address, and telephone number, the 12    relationship of that person to the patient, the date the 13    surrogate was identified, and the name of the health care 14    facility where the patient was determined to lack 15    decisional capacity;16        (4) that a copy of this written information shall be 17    placed in the patient's medical record and be provided to 18    any transferring health care provider or health care 19    facility;20        (5) that the health care provider relying upon a 21    surrogate for medical decision making shall ensure the 22    surrogate form is provided to and is accessible to the 23    health care provider's health information or medical 24    records department; and 25        (6) that each health care provider shall be required 26    to disclose the identity of a patient's health care   SB3398 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17550 JRC 30978 b1    surrogate to any person qualified under subsection (a) 2    upon proper documentation of the relationship to the 3    patient if any qualified person under subsection (a) 4    requests such information. 5(Source: P.A. 100-959, eff. 1-1-19.) 6    (755 ILCS 40/30)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 851-30)7    Sec. 30. Reliance on authority of surrogate decision 8maker. 9    (a) Every health care provider and other person (a 10"reliant") shall have the right to rely on any decision or 11direction by the surrogate decision maker (the "surrogate") 12that is not clearly contrary to this Act, to the same extent 13and with the same effect as though the decision or direction 14had been made or given by a patient with decisional capacity. 15Any person dealing with the surrogate may presume in the 16absence of actual knowledge to the contrary that the acts of 17the surrogate conform to the provisions of this Act. A reliant 18will not be protected who has actual knowledge that the 19surrogate is not entitled to act or that any particular action 20or inaction is contrary to the provisions of this Act.21    (b) A health care provider (a "provider") who relies on 22and carries out a surrogate's directions, including a request 23from a surrogate for records under subsection (e) of Section 2425, and who acts with due care and in accordance with this Act 25shall not be subject to any claim based on lack of patient   SB3398 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17550 JRC 30978 b1consent or authorization, including, but not limited to, 2claims of violation of privacy rights, or to criminal 3prosecution or discipline for unprofessional conduct. Nothing 4in this Act shall be deemed to protect a provider from 5liability for the provider's own negligence in the performance 6of the provider's duties or in carrying out any instructions 7of the surrogate, and nothing in this Act shall be deemed to 8alter the law of negligence as it applies to the acts of any 9surrogate or provider.10    (c) A surrogate who acts or fails to act with due care and 11in accordance with the provisions of this Act shall not be 12subject to criminal prosecution or any claim based upon lack 13of surrogate authority or failure to act. The surrogate shall 14not be liable merely because the surrogate may benefit from 15the act, has individual or conflicting interests in relation 16to the care and affairs of the patient, or acts in a different 17manner with respect to the patient and the surrogate's own 18care or interests.19(Source: P.A. 87-749.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.